Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.441

Grain indemnity fund program—Processing of claims.

In the event a grain dealer or warehouse fails, as defined in *RCW 22.09.011(21), or otherwise fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated hereunder, the department shall process the claims of depositors producing written evidence of ownership disclosing a storage obligation or written evidence of a sale of commodities for damages caused by the failure, in the following manner:

(1) The department shall give notice and provide a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty days, to depositors possessing written evidence of ownership disclosing a storage obligation or written evidence of sale of commodities to file their written verified claims with the department.

(2) The department may investigate each claim and determine whether the claimant's commodities are under a storage obligation or whether a sale of commodities has occurred. The department shall notify each claimant, the grain warehouse operator or grain dealer, and the committee of the department's determination as to the validity and amount of each claimant's claim. A claimant, warehouse operator, or grain dealer may request a hearing on the department's determination within twenty days of receipt of written notification and a hearing shall be held by the department pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. Upon determining the amount and validity of the claim, the director shall pay the claim from the grain indemnity fund.

(3) The department may inspect and audit a failed warehouse operator, as defined by *RCW 22.09.011(21) to determine whether the warehouse operator has in his or her possession, sufficient quantities of commodities to cover his or her storage obligations. In the event of a shortage, the department shall determine each depositor's pro rata share of available commodities and the deficiency shall be considered as a claim of the depositor. Each type of commodity shall be treated separately for the purpose of determining shortages.

[ 2011 c 336 s 631; 1987 c 509 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 22.09.011 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (21) to subsection (9).

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.